Connecticut, session 2026, SB00028.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to require that sufficient funds
be appropriated to the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, to fund the nine regional fire training schools, as opposed to
providing such funds through any specific taxes or increased
surcharges, including, but not limited to, fees on insurance premiums.